Nevada, session 83, AB425.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, it is
solely the discretion of the teacher who provides instruction to a
pupil to determine:
(a) The grade assigned to the pupil; and
(b) Any components or weights that are factors in calculating
the grade assigned to the pupil.
2. For pupils in high school, the grade assigned to a pupil
must comply with the uniform grading scale prescribed by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 389.007.
3. Any person or entity, including, without limitation, the
State Board, the Department, the board of trustees of a school
district, an administrator or a teacher other than the instructor of
the course, shall not:
(a) Interfere with the professional judgment of the teacher
who provides instruction in carrying out the provisions of
subsection 1.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 389.007, prescribe
any regulation, policy or other directive that interferes with the
provisions of subsection 1, including, without limitation, a
-
*AB425*

– 3 –
regulation, policy or other directive that prescribes the minimum
grade a teacher may assign to a pupil.
4. Any regulation, policy or other directive issued by a person
or entity that interferes with the provisions of subsection 1 is void
and unenforceable.
5. As used in this section, “administrator” means the
principal, administrator or other person in charge of a public
school.
Sec. 3. 1. An administrator or the parent or legal guardian
of a pupil shall not, directly or indirectly, intimidate, threaten,
coerce or harass a teacher with the intent to interfere with or
compel the teacher to alter any grade assigned to the pupil or any
components or weights that are factors in calculating the grade
assigned to the pupil.
2. An administrator shall not discipline or retaliate against a
teacher solely for:
(a) The grade assigned to a pupil; or
(b) The refusal of the teacher to alter the grade assigned to a
pupil or the components or weights that are factors in calculating
the grade assigned to a pupil.
3. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. As used in this section, “administrator” means the
principal, administrator or other person in charge of a public
school.
Sec. 4. NRS 389.009 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.009 1. A public high school shall administer an
examination containing a number of questions, determined by the
public high school, which are identical to the questions contained in
the civics portion of the naturalization test adopted by the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services of the Department of
Homeland Security, to each pupil enrolled in the public high school.
2. A public high school shall:
(a) Determine the course in which the examination will be
administered;
(b) Establish the number of questions which will be included on
the examination, which must not be less than 50;
(c) Determine the desired score on the examination ; [and the
manner in which the results of the examination administered to a
pupil will affect the grade of the pupil in the course in which the
examination is administered;] and
(d) Not later than August 31 of each year, aggregate the results
of the examination for all pupils at the public high school and report
the aggregated results to the board of trustees of the school district
in which the public high school is located.
-
*AB425*

– 4 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, no pupil in
any public high school may receive a certificate or diploma of
graduation without having taken the examination described in
subsection 1.
4. A pupil may receive a waiver from the examination
administered pursuant to subsection 1 if:
(a) The pupil is a pupil with a disability and the waiver is in
accordance with his or her individualized education program;
(b) The pupil is identified as an English learner and the public
high school is unable to offer the examination in the language which
would be most likely to provide accurate results for the pupil; or
(c) The principal or administrator of the public high school
determines that the pupil has completed all other academic
requirements to receive a certificate or diploma of graduation and
has shown good cause for a waiver. The principal or administrator
of a public high school shall not grant a waiver pursuant to this
paragraph to more than 10 percent of each graduating class of the
public high school.
5. On or before December 31 of each year, the board of
trustees of each school district shall report the aggregated results of
the examination received by the board of trustees of the school
district pursuant to subsection 2 to the Department.
6. As used in this section, “public high school” includes,
without limitation, any charter school that operates as a high school.
Sec. 5. NRS 391.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.460 1. The Council shall:
(a) Make recommendations to the State Board concerning the
adoption of regulations for establishing a statewide performance
evaluation system to ensure that teachers, administrators who
provide primarily administrative services at the school level,
administrators at the district level who provide direct supervision of
the principal of a school, and who do not provide primarily direct
instructional services to pupils, and other licensed educational
personnel, regardless of whether licensed as a teacher or
administrator, including, without limitation, a principal and vice
principal are:
(1) Evaluated using multiple, fair, timely, rigorous and valid
methods ; [, which includes evaluations based upon pupil growth as
required by NRS 391.465;]
(2) Afforded a meaningful opportunity to improve their
effectiveness through professional development that is linked to
their evaluations; and
(3) Provided with the means to share effective educational
methods with other teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel throughout this State.
-
*AB425*

– 5 –
(b) Develop and recommend to the State Board a plan, including
duties and associated costs, for the development and implementation
of the performance evaluation system by the Department and school
districts.
(c) Consider the role of professional standards for teachers,
administrators and other licensed educational personnel, to which
paragraph (a) applies and, as it determines appropriate, develop a
plan for recommending the adoption of such standards by the State
Board.
(d) Develop and recommend to the State Board a process for
peer observations of teachers by qualified educational personnel
which is designed to provide assistance to teachers in meeting the
standards of effective teaching, and includes, without limitation,
conducting observations, participating in conferences before and
after observations of the teacher and providing information and
resources to the teacher about strategies for effective teaching.
2. The performance evaluation system recommended by the
Council must ensure that:
(a) Data derived from the evaluations is used to create
professional development programs that enhance the effectiveness
of teachers, administrators and other licensed educational personnel;
and
(b) A timeline is included for monitoring the performance
evaluation system at least annually for quality, reliability, validity,
fairness, consistency and objectivity.
3. The Council may establish such working groups, task forces
and similar entities from within or outside its membership as
necessary to address specific issues or otherwise to assist in its
work.
4. The State Board shall consider the recommendations made
by the Council pursuant to this section and shall adopt regulations
establishing a statewide performance evaluation system as required
by NRS 391.465.
Sec. 6. NRS 391.465 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.465 1. The State Board shall, based upon the
recommendations of the Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada
submitted pursuant to NRS 391.460, adopt regulations establishing a
statewide performance evaluation system which incorporates
multiple measures of an employee’s performance. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 3, the State Board shall prescribe
the tools to be used by a school district for obtaining such measures.
2. The statewide performance evaluation system must:
(a) Require that an employee’s overall performance is
determined to be:
(1) Highly effective;
-
*AB425*

– 6 –
(2) Effective;
(3) Developing; or
(4) Ineffective.
(b) Include the criteria for making each designation identified in
paragraph (a), which must include, without limitation, consideration
of whether the classes for which the employee is responsible exceed
the applicable recommended ratios of pupils per licensed teacher
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to NRS 388.890 and, if so,
the degree to which the ratios affect:
(1) The ability of the employee to carry out his or her
professional responsibilities; and
(2) The instructional practices of the employee.
(c) [Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3 of NRS
391.695 and subsections 2 and 3 of NRS 391.715, require that pupil
growth, as determined pursuant to NRS 391.480, account for 15
percent of the evaluation of a teacher or administrator who provides
direct instructional services to pupils at a school in a school district.
(d)] Include an evaluation of whether the teacher, or
administrator who provides primarily administrative services at the
school level or administrator at the district level who provides direct
supervision of the principal of a school, and who does not provide
primarily direct instructional services to pupils, regardless of
whether the probationary administrator is licensed as a teacher or
administrator, including, without limitation, a principal and vice
principal or licensed educational employee, other than a teacher or
administrator, employs practices and strategies to involve and
engage the parents and families of pupils.
[(e)] (d) Include a process for peer observations of teachers by
qualified educational personnel which is designed to provide
assistance to teachers in meeting the standards of effective teaching,
and includes, without limitation, conducting observations,
participating in conferences before and after observations of the
teacher and providing information and resources to the teacher about
strategies for effective teaching. The regulations must include the
criteria for school districts to determine which educational personnel
are qualified to conduct peer observations pursuant to the process.
[(f)] (e) Require a person who evaluates a teacher who is
responsible for a number of pupils that exceeds the applicable
recommended ratio of pupils per licensed teacher prescribed by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 388.890, who is a postprobationary
employee as defined in NRS 391.650 and whose performance on
that evaluation is designated as effective or highly effective to,
under the statewide performance evaluation system, award the
teacher an additional weight for criteria relating to:
-
*AB425*

– 7 –
(1) The manner in which the teacher structures a classroom
environment;
(2) The manner in which the teacher provides an opportunity
for extended discourse;
(3) The manner in which the teacher employs the cognitive
abilities and skills of all pupils;
(4) The manner in which the teacher engages with the
families of pupils; and
(5) The perception of pupils of the performance of the
teacher,
 that is equivalent to the percentage by which the ratio of pupils
for which the teacher is responsible exceeds the recommended ratio
of pupils per licensed teacher. Any additional weight awarded to a
teacher pursuant to this paragraph must not cause the score on a
criterion to exceed the maximum score that would otherwise be
possible on the criterion for a teacher rated as highly effective.
[(g)] (f) If an employee knowingly and willfully failed to
comply with the provisions of NRS 388.1351, indicate any
disciplinary actions taken against the employee pursuant to
NRS 388.1354.
3. A school district may apply to the State Board to use a
performance evaluation system and tools that are different than the
evaluation system and tools prescribed pursuant to subsection 1. The
application must be in the form prescribed by the State Board and
must include, without limitation, a description of the evaluation
system and tools proposed to be used by the school district. The
State Board may approve the use of the proposed evaluation system
and tools if it determines that the proposed evaluation system and
tools apply standards and indicators that are equivalent to those
prescribed by the State Board.
4. An administrator at the district level who provides direct
supervision of the principal of a school and who also serves as the
superintendent of schools of a school district must not be evaluated
using the statewide performance evaluation system.
Sec. 7. NRS 391.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.470 On or before August 1 of each year, the board of
trustees of each school district shall submit a report to the State
Board and the Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada created by
NRS 391.455 concerning the implementation and effectiveness of
the process for peer observations of teachers set forth in the
regulations adopted by the State Board pursuant to paragraph [(e)]
(d) of subsection 2 of NRS 391.465, including, without limitation,
any recommendations for revisions to the process of peer
observations.
-
*AB425*

– 8 –
Sec. 8. NRS 391.485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.485 1. The State Board shall annually review the
statewide performance evaluation system to ensure accuracy and
reliability. Such a review must include, without limitation, an
analysis of the:
(a) Number and percentage of teachers, administrators and other
licensed educational personnel who receive each designation
identified in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 391.465 in each
school, school district, and the State as a whole; and
(b) [Data used to evaluate pupil growth in each school, school
district and the State as a whole, including, without limitation, any
observations; and
(c)] Effect of the evaluations conducted pursuant to the
statewide system of accountability for public schools on the
academic performance of pupils enrolled in the school district in
each school and school district, and the State as a whole.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall annually
review the manner in which schools in the school district carry out
the evaluation of teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel pursuant to the statewide performance
evaluation system.
3. The Department may review the manner in which the
statewide performance evaluation system is carried out by each
school district . [, including, without limitation, the manner in which
the learning goals for pupils are established and evaluated pursuant
to NRS 391.480.]
Sec. 9. NRS 391.480 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
391.480 Development of learning goals for pupils;
Department to establish list of assessments to measure
achievement of learning goals; evaluation of educational
personnel based on achievement of learning goals; regulations.
-
*AB425*

– 9 –
1. Each teacher at a school in a school district shall, in
consultation with the principal of the school at which the teacher is
employed or other administrator who is assigned by the principal,
develop learning goals for the pupils of the teacher for a specified
period.
2. Each principal, vice principal and other administrator who
provides direct instructional services to pupils at a school in a school
district shall, in consultation with his or her direct supervisor,
develop learning goals for the pupils at the school where the
principal, vice principal or other administrator, as applicable, is
employed for a specified period.
3. The Department shall establish a list of assessments that
may be used by a school or school district to measure the
achievement of learning goals established pursuant to this section.
4. The board of trustees of each school district shall ensure that
the learning goals for pupils established pursuant to this section
measure pupil growth in accordance with the criteria established by
regulation of the State Board.
5. Each teacher and administrator who establishes learning
goals for pupils pursuant to this section must be evaluated at the end
of the specified period to determine the extent to which the learning
goals of the pupils were achieved. Such an evaluation must be
conducted in accordance with the criteria established by regulation
of the State Board for determining the level of pupil growth for the
purposes of the statewide performance evaluation system. The State
Board may establish by regulation the manner in which to include
certain categories of pupils in the evaluation conducted pursuant to
this subsection.
H
-
*AB425*